apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="dover/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diritt/o-dovere__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i-doveri</l> 
        <r>o-dovere<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o-dovere</l> 
        <r>o-dovere<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diritt/o-tv__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i-tv</l> 
        <r>o-tv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o-tv</l> 
        <r>o-tv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="disc/o__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hi</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="disdi/nte__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cevo</l> 
        <r>nte<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/dispari__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/pari__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="disco">
        <i>disc</i> 
        <par n="disc/o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dispari">
        <i>dispari</i> 
        <par n="/dispari__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dovere">
        <i>dover</i> 
        <par n="dover/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="eco">
        <i>ec</i> 
        <par n="disc/o__n" /> 
    </e>
